Florida, session 2026, SB750.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 13 553.791, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 553.791âAlternative plans review and inspection.â 15 (2) 16 (b)âIf an owner or contractor retains a private provider 17 for purposes of plans review or building inspection services, 18 the local jurisdiction must reduce the permit fee by the amount 19 of cost savings realized by the local enforcement agency for not 20 having to perform such services. Such reduction may be 21 calculated on a flat fee or percentage basis, or any other 22 reasonable means by which a local enforcement agency assesses 23 the cost for its plans review or inspection services. The local 24 jurisdiction may not charge fees for building inspections if the 25 fee owner or contractor hires a private provider to perform such 26 services; however, the local jurisdiction may charge a 27 reasonable administrative fee, which shall be based on the cost 28 that is actually incurred, including the labor cost of the 29 personnel providing the service, by the local jurisdiction or 30 attributable to the local jurisdiction for the clerical and 31 supervisory assistance required, or both. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.